Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,224
County board; election; question; effect.

The county board shall submit the question of imposing a license or occupation tax under section 77-27,223 to the registered voters at any primary or general election or at a special election if the county submits a certified copy of the resolution proposing the tax to the election commissioner or county clerk within a reasonable time prior to the primary, general, or special election. The question may include any terms and conditions set forth in the resolution proposing the tax, such as a termination date or the specific project or program for which the revenue will be allocated, and shall include the following language: Shall the county board impose a license or occupation tax upon any person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or business engaged in the sale of admissions to recreational, cultural, entertainment, or concert events within the county on which the State of Nebraska is authorized to impose a sales tax? If a majority of those voting on the question are in favor of the tax, then the county board shall be empowered to impose the tax and shall forthwith proceed to impose the tax. If a majority of those voting on the question are opposed to the tax, then the county board shall not impose the tax.

Laws 2002, LB 259, § 2.